Illinois, session 104th, HB4277.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Notary Public Act is amended by 5changing Section 2-102 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 312/2-102)  (from Ch. 102, par. 202-102)7    Sec. 2-102. Application. 8    (a) Application for notary public commission. Every 9applicant for appointment and commission as a notary shall 10complete an application in a format prescribed by the 11Secretary of State to be filed with the Secretary of State, 12stating:13        (1) the applicant's official name, as it appears on 14    his or her current driver's license or state-issued 15    identification card;16        (2) the county in which the applicant resides or, if 17    the applicant is a resident of a state bordering Illinois, 18    the county in Illinois in which that person's principal 19    place of work or principal place of business is located;20        (3) the applicant's residence address, as it appears 21    on his or her current driver's license or state-issued 22    identification card;23        (4) the applicant's e-mail address;   HB4277 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16959 BDA 30373 b1        (5) the applicant's business address if different than 2    the applicant's residence address, if performing notarial 3    acts constitutes any portion of the applicant's job 4    duties; 5        (6) that the applicant has resided in the State of 6    Illinois for 30 days preceding the application or that the 7    applicant who is a resident of a state bordering Illinois 8    has worked or maintained a business in Illinois for 30 9    days preceding the application;10        (7) that the applicant is a citizen of the United 11    States or lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the 12    United States;13        (8) the applicant's date of birth;14        (9) that the applicant is proficient in the English 15    language;16        (10) that the applicant has not had a prior 17    application or commission revoked due to a finding or 18    decision by the Secretary of State;19        (11) that the applicant, prior to the completion of 20    the application, if the applicant has ever been convicted 21    of a felony, has completed all requirements of all felony 22    case sentences, and 10 years have passed since the 23    completion of all felony sentences has not been convicted 24    of a felony ;25        (12) that the applicant's signature authorizes the 26    Office of the Secretary of State to conduct a verification   HB4277 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16959 BDA 30373 b1    to confirm the information provided in the application, 2    including a criminal background check of the applicant, if 3    necessary; 4        (13) that the applicant has provided satisfactory 5    proof to the Secretary of State that the applicant has 6    successfully completed any required course of study on 7    notarization; and 8        (14) any other information the Secretary of State 9    deems necessary.10    (b) Any notary appointed under subsection (a) shall have 11the authority to conduct remote notarizations. 12    (c) Application for electronic notary public commission. 13An application for an electronic notary public commission must 14be filed with the Secretary of State in a manner prescribed by 15the Secretary of State. Every applicant for appointment and 16commission as an electronic notary public shall complete an 17application to be filed with the Secretary of State, stating:18        (1) all information required to be included in an 19    application for appointment as an electronic notary 20    public, as provided under subsection (a);21        (2) that the applicant is commissioned as a notary 22    public under this Act;23        (3) the applicant's email address;24        (4) that the applicant has provided satisfactory proof 25    to the Secretary of State that the applicant has 26    successfully completed any required course of study on   HB4277 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16959 BDA 30373 b1    electronic notarization and passed a qualifying 2    examination;3        (5) a description of the technology or device that the 4    applicant intends to use to create his or her electronic 5    signature in performing electronic notarial acts;6        (6) the electronic signature of the applicant; and7        (7) any other information the Secretary of State deems 8    necessary.9    (d) Electronic notarial acts. Before an electronic notary 10public performs an electronic notarial act using audio-video 11communication, he or she must be granted an electronic notary 12public commission by the Secretary of State under this 13Section, and identify the technology that the electronic 14notary public intends to use, which must be approved by the 15Secretary of State.16    (e) Approval of commission. Upon the applicant's 17fulfillment of the requirements for a notarial commission or 18an electronic notary public commission, the Secretary of State 19shall approve the commission and issue to the applicant a 20unique commission number.21    (f) Rejection of application. The Secretary of State may 22reject an application for a notarial commission or an 23electronic notary public commission if the applicant fails to 24comply with any Section of this Act. 25(Source: P.A. 102-160, eff. 6-5-23 (See Section 91 of P.A. 26103-562 for effective date of P.A. 102-160); 102-1030, eff.   HB4277 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16959 BDA 30373 b15-27-22.)